North Carolina statutes. Chapter 11. Oaths.
Article 2. Forms of Official and Other Oaths.

§ 11-11.
Oaths of various persons; forms.

The oaths of office to be taken by the persons listed in this section shall be in the words following the names of the persons respectively, in all cases after taking the separate oath required by Article VI, Section 7 of the Constitution of North Carolina:

Administrator You swear (or affirm) that you believe A. B. died without leaving any last will and testament; that you will well and truly administer all and singular the goods and chattels, rights and credits of the said A. B., and a true and perfect inventory thereof return according to law; and that all other duties appertaining to the charge reposed in you, you will well and truly perform, according to law, and with your best skill and ability; so help you, God. Attorney at Law I, A. B., do swear (or affirm) that I will truly and honestly demean myself in the practice of an attorney, according to the best of my knowledge and ability; so help me, God. Attorney General, State District Attorneys and County Attorneys I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will well and truly serve the State of North Carolina in the office of Attorney General (district attorney for the State or attorney for the State in the county of ); I will, in the execution of my office, endeavor to have the criminal laws fairly and impartially administered, so far as in me lies, according to the best of my knowledge and ability; so help me, God. Auditor I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will well and truly execute the trust reposed in me as auditor, without favor or partiality, according to law, to the best of my knowledge and ability; so help me, God. Book Debt Oath You swear (or affirm) that the matter in dispute is a book account; that you have no means to prove the delivery of such articles, as you propose to prove by your own oath, or any of them, but by yourself; and you further swear that the account rendered by you is just and true; and that you have given all just credits; so help you, God. Book Debt Oath for Administrator You, as executor or administrator of A. B., swear (or affirm) that you verily believe this account to be just and true, and that there are no witnesses, to your knowledge, capable of proving the delivery of the articles therein charged; and that you found the book or account so stated, and do not know of any other or further credit to be given than what is therein given; so help you, God. Clerk of the Supreme Court I, , do solemnly swear that I will discharge the duties of the office of clerk of the Supreme Court without prejudice, affection, favor, or partiality, according to law and to the best of my skill and ability, so help me, God. Clerk of the Superior Court I, A. B., do swear (or affirm) that, by myself or any other person, I neither have given, nor will I give, to any person whatsoever, any gratuity, fee, gift or reward, in consideration of my election or appointment to the office of clerk of the superior court for the county of ; nor have I sold, or offered to sell, nor will I sell or offer to sell, my interest in the said office; I also solemnly swear that I do not, directly or indirectly, hold any other lucrative office in the State; and I do further swear that I will execute the office of clerk of the superior court for the county of without prejudice, favor, affection or partiality, to the best of my skill and ability; so help me, God. Commissioners Allotting a Year’s Provisions You and each of you swear (or affirm) that you will lay off and allot to the petitioner a year’s provisions for herself and family, according to law, and with your best skill and ability; so help you, God. Commissioners Apportioning Real Estate You and each of you swear (or affirm) that, in the partition of the real estate now about to be made by you, you will do equal and impartial justice among the several claimants, according to their several rights, and agreeably to law; so help you, God. Executor You swear (or affirm) that you believe this writing to be and contain the last will and testament of A. B., deceased; and that you will well and truly execute the same by first paying debts and then devises, as far as the decedent’s estate shall extend or the law shall charge you; and that you will well and faithfully execute the office of an executor, agreeably to the trust and confidence reposed in you, and according to law; so help you, God. Grand Jury—Foreman of You, as foreman of this grand inquest for the body of this county, shall diligently inquire and true presentment make of all such matters and things as shall be given you in charge; the State’s counsel, your fellows’ and your own you shall keep secret; you shall present no one for envy, hatred or malice; neither shall you leave anyone unpresented for fear, favor or affection, reward or the hope of reward; but you shall present all things truly, as they come to your knowledge, according to the best of your understanding; so help you, God. Grand Jurors The same oath which your foreman hath taken on his part, you and each of you shall well and truly observe and keep on your part; so help you, God. Grand Jury—Officer of You swear (or affirm) that you will faithfully carry all papers sent from the court to the grand jury, or from the grand jury to the court, without alteration or erasement, and without disclosing the contents thereof; so help you, God. Jury—Officer of You swear (or affirm) that you will keep every person sworn on this jury in some private and convenient place when in your charge. You shall not suffer any person to speak to them, neither shall you speak to them yourself, unless it be to ask them whether they are agreed in their verdict, but with leave of the court; so help you, God. Oath for Petit Juror You do solemnly swear (affirm) that you will truthfully and without prejudice or partiality try all issues in civil or criminal actions that come before you and give true verdicts according to the evidence, so help you, God. Justice, Judge, or Magistrate of the General Court of Justice I, , do solemnly swear (affirm) that I will administer justice without favoritism to anyone or to the State; that I will not knowingly take, directly or indirectly, any fee, gift, gratuity or reward whatsoever, for any matter or thing done by me or to be done by me by virtue of my office, except the salary and allowances by law provided; and that I will faithfully and impartially discharge all the duties of of the Division of the General Court of Justice to the best of my ability and understanding, and consistent with the Constitution and laws of the State; so help me, God. Register of Deeds I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully and truly, according to the best of my skill and ability, execute the duties of the office of register of deeds for the county of , in all things according to law; so help me, God. Secretary of State I, A. B., do swear (or affirm) that I will, in all respects, faithfully and honestly execute the office of Secretary of State of the State of North Carolina, during my continuance in office, according to law; so help me, God. Sheriff I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will execute the office of sheriff of county to the best of my knowledge and ability, agreeably to law; and that I will not take, accept or receive, directly or indirectly, any fee, gift, bribe, gratuity or reward whatsoever, for returning any man to serve as a juror or for making any false return on any process to me directed; so help me, God. Law Enforcement Officer I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will be alert and vigilant to enforce the criminal laws of this State; that I will not be influenced in any matter on account of personal bias or prejudice; that I will faithfully and impartially execute the duties of my office as a law enforcement officer according to the best of my skill, abilities, and judgment; so help me, God. State Treasurer I, A. B., do swear (or affirm) that, according to the best of my abilities and judgment, I will execute impartially the office of State Treasurer, in all things according to law, and account for the public taxes; and I will not, directly or indirectly, apply the public money to any other use than by law directed; so help me, God. Surveyor for a County I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will well and impartially discharge the several duties of the office of surveyor for the county of , according to law; so help me, God. Treasurer for a County I, A. B., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that, according to the best of my skill and ability, I will execute impartially the office of treasurer for the county of , in all things according to law; that I will duly and faithfully account for all public moneys that may come into my hands, and will not, directly or indirectly, apply the same, or any part thereof, to any other use than by law directed; so help me, God. Witness to Depose before the Grand Jury You swear (or affirm) that the evidence you shall give to the grand jury, upon this bill of indictment against A. B., shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth; so help you, God. Witness in a Capital Trial You swear (or affirm) that the evidence you shall give to the court and jury in this trial, between the State and the prisoner at the bar, shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth; so help you, God. Witness in a Criminal Action You swear (or affirm) that the evidence you shall give to the court and jury in this action between the State and A. B. shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth; so help you, God. Witness in Civil Cases You swear (or affirm) that the evidence you shall give to the court and jury in this cause now on trial, wherein A. B. is plaintiff and C. D. defendant, shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth; so help you, God. Witness to Prove a Will You swear (or affirm) that you saw C. D. execute (or heard him acknowledge the execution of) this writing as his last will and testament; that you attested it in his presence and at his request; and that at the time of its execution (or at the time the execution was acknowledged) he was, in your opinion, of sound mind and disposing memory; so help you, God. Witness before a Legislative Committee or Commission You swear (or affirm) that the testimony you shall give to the committee (or commission) shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth; so help you, God. General Oath Any officer of the State or of any county or township, the term of whose oath is not given above, shall take an oath in the following form: I, A. B., do swear (or affirm) that I will well and truly execute the duties of the office of according to the best of my skill and ability, according to law; so help me, God.

Click to view

History.

R.C., c. 76, s. 6; 1874-5, c. 58, s. 2; Code, ss. 3057, 3315; 1903, c. 604; Rev., s. 2360; C.S., s. 3199; 1947, c. 71; 1959, c. 879, s. 5; 1967, c. 218, s. 2; 1969, c. 1190, ss. 50, 51; 1971, c. 381, s. 11; 1977, c. 344, s. 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 953; 1995, c. 379, s. 10; 1997-14, s. 1; 2011-284, s. 8; 2013-164, s. 2; 2020-23, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 8, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “by first paying debts and then devises, as far as the decedent’s estate” for “by first paying his debts and then his legacies, as far as the said estate” in the executor’s oath.

Session Laws 2013-164, s. 2, effective October 1, 2013, inserted “in all cases” in the first paragraph of this section. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2020-23, s. 11, effective October 1, 2020, substituted “various persons” for “sundry persons” in the section heading; substituted “persons listed in this section” for “several persons hereafter named” in the first sentence; substituted “Apportioning Real Estate” for “Dividing and Allotting Real Estate” in the heading of the form; and made a minor stylistic change.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 491.